Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2106
Name.

Every corporation created under the provisions of sections 21-2101 to 21-2117 shall have as a part of its corporate name or title the words business development.

Laws 1967, c. 100, § 6, p. 304.